Hawaii, session 2026, HB1109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to prohibit the sale or offer for sale or distribution of manufactured hemp products to individuals under the age of twenty-one, thereby protecting public health and ensuring responsible consumption of hemp-derived products. SECTION 2.  Chapter 328G, Hawaii Revised Statues, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§328G-     Manufactured hemp product; sale to persons under twenty-one prohibited. (a)  No person shall sell or offer for sale or distribution any manufactured hemp product to any individual under the age of twenty-one years. (b)  No retailer shall sell manufactured hemp products except in direct face-to-face or online direct shipment exchanges between the retailer and a consumer. (c)  A retailer shall verify the age of any individual attempting to purchase manufactured hemp products by checking a valid government-issued photo identification; provided that an online retailer shall either obtain a copy of a valid government-issued photo identification or use an age-verification service to check a valid government-issued photo identification before selling any manufactured hemp products. (d)  Any manufactured hemp products offered for sale shall be displayed or stored: (1)  Behind a sales counter or in any other area of the establishment that is inaccessible to the public; or (2)  In a locked container. (e)  A retailer shall prominently display a notice on its premises and website indicating that the sale of manufactured hemp products to anyone under the age of twenty-one years is prohibited. (f)  Any person who violates this section shall be fined pursuant to section 328G-6. (g)  For the purpose of this section, "retailer" means a person who engages in the practice of selling manufactured hemp products to consumers.  "Retailer" includes its agents and employees." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST